Washington statutes.
RCW 5.62.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Registered nurse" means a registered nurse or advanced nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.

(2) "Protocol" means a regimen to be carried out by a registered nurse and prescribed by a licensed physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, or a licensed osteopathic physician under chapter 18.57 RCW, which is consistent with chapter 18.79 RCW and the rules adopted under that chapter.

(3) "Primary care" means screening, assessment, diagnosis, and treatment for the purpose of promotion of health and detection of disease or injury, as authorized by chapter 18.79 RCW and the rules adopted under that chapter.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 703; 1987 c 198 s 1; 1985 c 447 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.